Illinois, session 104th, HB4328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Smoke Detector Act is amended by changing 5Section 4 and by adding Section 3.1 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 60/3.1 new)7    Sec. 3.1. Non-approved smoke detectors banned. Beginning 8December 31, 2027, it is unlawful for any person to sell, offer 9for sale, or give as a gift within the State of Illinois any 10smoke detector that does not meet the requirements of 11subsection (e) of Section 3 of this Act. Nothing in this 12Section shall prohibit any person from manufacturing within 13the State and distributing, selling, offering for sale, or 14giving as a gift outside the State any smoke detector that does 15not meet the requirements of subsection (e) of Section 3 of 16this Act. As used in this Section, "person" means an 17individual, natural person, public or private corporation, 18government, partnership, unincorporated association, or other 19entity. 20    (425 ILCS 60/4)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 804)21    Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), willful 22failure to install or maintain in operating condition any   HB4328 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16304 BDA 29690 b1smoke detector required by this Act shall be a Class B 2misdemeanor.3    (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), tampering with, 4removing, destroying, disconnecting or removing the batteries 5from any installed smoke detector, except in the course of 6inspection, maintenance or replacement of the detector, shall 7be a Class A misdemeanor in the case of a first conviction, and 8a Class 4 felony in the case of a second or subsequent 9conviction.10    (c) A party in violation of the battery requirements of 11subsection (e) of Section 3 of this Act shall be provided with 1290 days' warning with which to rectify that violation. If that 13party fails to rectify the violation within that 90-day 14period, he or she may be assessed a fine of up to $100, and may 15be fined $100 every 30 days thereafter until either the 16violation is rectified or the cumulative amount of fines 17assessed reaches $1,500. The provisions of subsection (a) and 18(b) of this Section shall apply only after the penalty 19provided under this subsection (c) has been exhausted to the 20extent that a violating party has reached the $1,500 21cumulative fine threshold and has failed to rectify the 22violation. 23    If the alleged violation has been corrected prior to or on 24the date of the hearing scheduled to adjudicate the alleged 25violation, then the violation shall be dismissed. 26    (d) A person who violates Section 3.1 of this Act is guilty   HB4328 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16304 BDA 29690 b1of a petty offense and is subject to a fine of at least $500 2and not more than $1,000. 3(Source: P.A. 100-200, eff. 1-1-23; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.)